Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-257
Unlawful detention or placement; penalty.

Any person who knowingly holds a juvenile in detention or placement in violation of any of the provisions of section 43-255 or 43-256 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 13.